Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2,259
Federal Current Good Manufacturing Practice; adoption.

The Legislature hereby adopts by reference the federal Current Good Manufacturing Practice found in 21 C.F.R. 117.4 and 117.10 to 117.110 as such regulations existed on April 1, 2024.

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB771, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB798, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 6.